Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.010

Declaration of public policies—Purpose.

It is declared to be the public policy of the state and a recognized governmental function to assist in making affordable and decent housing available throughout the state and by so doing to contribute to the general welfare. Decent housing for the people of our state is a most important public concern. Interest rates and construction costs have made it impossible for many Washington citizens to purchase their own homes. Older people, disabled persons, and low and moderate-income families often cannot afford to rent decent housing. There exists throughout the state a serious shortage of safe, sanitary and energy efficient housing available at prices within the financial means of our citizens. General economic development within the state is also impeded by a lack of affordable housing. The state's economy, which is dependent on the timber, wood products, and construction industries, has been damaged by inadequate investment in housing construction and rehabilitation. The result has been high unemployment and economic hardship affecting the prosperity of all the people of the state, particularly those in the wood products industry.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a state housing finance commission to act as a financial conduit which, without using public funds or lending the credit of the state or local government, can issue nonrecourse revenue bonds and participate in federal, state, and local housing programs and thereby make additional funds available at affordable rates to help provide housing throughout the state. It is also a primary purpose of this chapter to encourage the use of Washington state forest products in residential construction. This chapter is enacted to accomplish these and related purposes and shall be liberally construed to carry out its purposes and objectives.

[ 1983 c 161 s 1.]